Maryland, session 2025, HB0328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–112.
(a) (1) In this section[, “veterans’] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “ACTIVE MEMBERS” MEANS INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE RECOGNIZED
BY A FRATERNAL ORGANIZATION AS DUES–PAYING MEMBERS OR LIFETIME
MEMBERS.
(3) (I) “FRATERNAL ORGANIZATION” MEANS A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION THAT:
1. A. IS TAX EXEMPT AND ORGANIZED AS A
FRATERNAL OR SORORAL ORGANIZATION UNDER § 501(C)(7) OR § 501(C)(8) OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE;
B. OWNS OR LEASES A PROPERTY; AND
C. HAS A BONA FIDE MEMBERSHIP OF AT LEAST 300
ACTIVE MEMBERS OR HAS BEEN LOCATED IN A COUNTY IN WHICH SUBSECTION (D)
OF THIS SECTION APPLIES FOR AT LEAST 5 YEARS BEFORE THE ORGANIZATION
APPLIES FOR A LICENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION; OR
2. IS INDEPENDENT AND THE MEMBERSHIP OF WHICH
COMPRISES SOLELY GRADUATE MEMBERS OF A NATIONWIDE FRATERNITY OR
SORORITY THAT IS TAX EXEMPT UNDER § 501(C)(7) OR § 501(C)(8) OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(II) “FRATERNAL ORGANIZATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. ANY COLLEGE OR HIGH SCHOOL FRATERNITY OR
SORORITY; OR

HOUSE BILL 328 3
2. ANY OTHER FRATERNITY OR SORORITY THE
MEMBERSHIP OF WHICH IS RESTRICTED IN WHOLE OR IN PART TO STUDENTS OR
GRADUATES OF AN EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION OR A PROFESSIONAL SCHOOL.
(4) “VETERANS’ organization” means an organization that is tax exempt
and organized as a veterans’ organization under § 501(c)(19) or § 501(c)(4) of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, in accordance with the
regulations of the Agency and this subtitle, the Director shall issue licenses to the persons
and governmental units that will best serve the public convenience and promote the sale of
State lottery tickets or shares.
(c) Before issuing a license to an applicant, the Director [shall] MAY consider
such factors as:
(1) the financial responsibility and security of the applicant and the
business or activity of the applicant;
(2) the accessibility of the place of business or activity to the public;
(3) the sufficiency of existing licenses to serve the public convenience; and
(4) the volume of expected sales.
(d) (1) This subsection does not apply in:
(i) Caroline County;
(ii) Cecil County;
(iii) Dorchester County;
(iv) Kent County;
(v) Queen Anne’s County;
(vi) Somerset County;
(vii) Talbot County;
(viii) Wicomico County; and
(ix) Worcester County.

HOUSE BILL 328
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the Director may
issue a license under this subtitle for:
1. not more than five instant ticket lottery machines to an
applicant that is a veterans’ organization OR FRATERNAL ORGANIZATION; AND
2. NOT MORE THAN THREE INSTANT TICKET LOTTERY
MACHINES TO AN APPLICANT THAT IS A FRATERNAL ORGANIZATION.
(ii) A veterans’ organization OR FRATERNAL ORGANIZATION that
is issued a license under this subsection shall locate and operate its instant ticket lottery
machines at its principal meeting hall in the county in which the veterans’ organization OR
FRATERNAL ORGANIZATION is located.
(III) AS A RETAILER UNDER THE INSTANT TICKET LOTTERY
MACHINE PROGRAM, A VETERANS’ ORGANIZATION OR FRATERNAL ORGANIZATION
SHALL BE COMPENSATED BASED ON A PERCENTAGE OF PROCEEDS.
(3) (I) After deduction of any [commission and] validation prize payout
as provided under § 9–117 of this subtitle, a veterans’ organization issued a license under
this subsection shall RETAIN 50% OF THE NET PROCEEDS AND credit the remaining
receipts NET PROCEEDS from the sale of tickets from instant ticket lottery machines to
the State Lottery Fund established under § 9–118 of this subtitle.
(II) ON A PROPERLY APPROVED TRANSMITTAL, THE AGENCY
SHALL PAY THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS FROM THE NET PROCEEDS OF SALES OF
TICKETS FROM INSTANT TICKET LOTTERY MACHINES OPERATED BY A VETERANS’
ORGANIZATION:
1. 50% TO VETERANS’ ORGANIZATIONS 5% TO THE
MARYLAND VETERANS TRUST FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–913 OF THIS TITLE;
2. TO THE AGENCY, AN AMOUNT NECESSARY TO PAY FOR
THE PURCHASE OR LEASE OF THE INSTANT TICKET LOTTERY MACHINES AND
AGENCY ADMINISTRATION FEES FOR THE PROGRAM; AND
3. ANY REMAINING AMOUNT TO THE EDUCATION TRUST
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1A–30 OF THIS TITLE.
(III) AFTER DEDUCTION OF A VALIDATION PRIZE PAYOUT, A
FRATERNAL ORGANIZATION ISSUED A LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
REMIT THE PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF TICKETS FROM INSTANT TICKET LOTTERY
MACHINES:

HOUSE BILL 328 5
1. RETAIN 25% OF THE NET PROCEEDS FOR
UNDERGRADUATE, GRADUATE, OR TRADE SCHOOL SCHOLARSHIPS OR CAPITAL
IMPROVEMENTS, CAPITAL OUTLAYS, ACQUISITIONS, OR EXISTING COMMUNITY
OUTREACH PROGRAMS AND RESOURCES; AND
2. REMIT THE REMAINDER TO THE AGENCY TO BE
DISTRIBUTED AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(IV) ON A PROPERLY APPROVED TRANSMITTAL, THE AGENCY
SHALL PAY THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS FROM THE NET PROCEEDS OF SALES OF
TICKETS FROM INSTANT TICKET LOTTERY MACHINES OPERATED BY A FRATERNAL
ORGANIZATION:
1. 20% TO THE HOMELESSNESS SOLUTIONS PROGRAM
IN THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, TO BE USED,
IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY
FAMILIES, TO ASSIST VETERANS AND FAMILIES OF VETERANS, WITH PRIORITY
GIVEN TO:
A. WOMEN VETERANS WHO ARE HOMELESS OR AT RISK
OF HOMELESSNESS;
B. SINGLE–PARENT VETERAN FAMILIES; AND
C. VETERANS WHO ARE VICTIMS OF DOMESTIC
VIOLENCE; AND
2. FROM THE REMAINING PROCEEDS OF SALES OF
TICKETS FROM INSTANT TICKET LOTTERY MACHINES OPERATED BY A FRATERNAL
ORGANIZATION:
A. 25% TO THE FRATERNAL ORGANIZATION TO BE USED
FOR UNDERGRADUATE, GRADUATE, OR TRADE SCHOOL SCHOLARSHIPS OR CAPITAL
IMPROVEMENTS, CAPITAL OUTLAY, ACQUISITIONS, OR EXISTING COMMUNITY
OUTREACH PROGRAMS AND RESOURCES;
2. 5% TO THE MARYLAND VETERANS TRUST FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–913 OF THIS TITLE;
B. 3. TO THE AGENCY, AN AMOUNT NECESSARY TO PAY FOR
THE PURCHASE OR LEASE OF THE INSTANT TICKET LOTTERY MACHINES AND
AGENCY ADMINISTRATION FEES FOR THE PROGRAM; AND

HOUSE BILL 328
C. 4. ANY REMAINING AMOUNT TO THE EDUCATION TRUST
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1A–30 OF THIS TITLE.
(4) [(i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, a veterans’
organization issued a license under this subsection shall purchase or lease the instant
ticket lottery machines to be used by the veterans’ organization.
(ii)] An organization may not use receipts NET PROCEEDS from the
sale of tickets from instant ticket lottery machines that would otherwise be [credited to the
State Lottery Fund] DISTRIBUTED AS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION for the costs of purchasing or leasing instant ticket lottery machines.
(5) (I) The Director may adopt regulations to implement the provisions
of this subsection that include restricting the location of instant ticket lottery machines in
areas of a veterans’ organization’s OR A FRATERNAL ORGANIZATION’S public meeting
hall that is accessible to the public.
(II) A FRATERNAL ORGANIZATION MAY NOT LOCATE OR
OPERATE ITS INSTANT TICKET LOTTERY MACHINES IN A MEETING HALL THAT IS:
1. LOCATED ON OR AFFILIATED WITH THE CAMPUS OF
AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION; OR
2. LOCATED IN A BUILDING WHERE STUDENTS OF AN
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION RESIDE.
(6) The Agency shall ensure that the element of chance in the conduct of
the gaming through the instant ticket lottery machines established under this subsection
is consistent with the holding in the case of Chesapeake Amusements Inc. v. Riddle, 363
Md. 16 (2001), in that the element of chance must be CONTAINED wholly within the
pre–printed PREDETERMINED instant lottery ticket, and that player enhancements in an
instant ticket lottery machine may not affect the element of chance being wholly within the
pre–printed instant lottery ticket.
(e) The Director may not issue a license to:
(1) a person or governmental unit to engage in business primarily as a
licensed agent; or
(2) an individual who is under the age of 21 years.
(f) The Commission may hear and decide an appeal of a denial of a license.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.